Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Department of Land Conservation and Devel-
opment, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General  Fund, the following
amounts, for the following purposes:
(1) Planning program ..................... $ 12,098,089
(2) Grant programs ........................ $ 1,638,830
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$1,462,949 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by  the Department of
Land Conservation and Development.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$6,772,223 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses  from federal funds collected or received by the Department of Land
Conservation and Development.
SECTION 4. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Enrolled House Bill 5027 (HB 5027-A) Page 1
Passed by House June 17, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5027 (HB 5027-A) Page 2